California statutes. Corporations Code
(1) In respect of any claim, issue or matter as to which the person shall have been adjudged to be liable to the corporation in the performance of the person’s duty to the corporation, unless and only to the extent that the court in which
 the proceeding is or was pending shall determine upon application that, in view of all the circumstances of the case,
 the
 person is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnity for the expenses which the court shall determine;

(2) Of amounts paid in settling or otherwise disposing of a threatened or pending action, with or without court approval; or

(3) Of expenses incurred in defending a threatened or pending action which is settled or otherwise disposed of without court approval unless it is settled with the approval of the Attorney General.

(d) To the extent that an agent of a corporation has been successful on the merits in defense of any proceeding referred to in subdivision (b) or (c) or in defense of any claim, issue or
 matter therein, the agent shall be indemnified against expenses actually and reasonably incurred by the agent in connection therewith.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (d), any indemnification under this section shall be made by the corporation only if authorized in the specific case, upon a determination that indemnification of the agent is proper in the circumstances because the agent has met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in subdivision (b) or (c), by:

(1) A majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors who are not parties to the proceeding;

(2) Approval of the members (Section 5034), with the
 persons to be indemnified not being entitled to vote thereon; or

(3) The court in which the proceeding is or was pending upon application made by the corporation or the agent or the attorney or other person rendering services in connection with the defense, whether or not the application by the agent, attorney, or other person is opposed by the corporation.

(f) Expenses incurred in
 defending any proceeding may be advanced by the corporation prior to the final disposition of the
 proceeding upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of the agent to repay the amount unless it shall be determined ultimately that the agent is entitled to be indemnified as authorized in this section. The provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 5236 do not apply to advances made pursuant to this subdivision.

(g) No provision made by a corporation to indemnify its or its subsidiary’s directors or officers for the defense of any proceeding, whether contained in the articles, bylaws, a resolution of members or directors, an agreement or otherwise, shall be valid unless consistent with this section. Nothing contained in this section shall affect any right to indemnification to which persons other than
 the directors and officers may be entitled by contract or otherwise.

(h) No indemnification or advance shall be made under this section, except as provided in subdivision (d) or paragraph (3) of subdivision (e), in any circumstance where it appears:

(1) That it would be inconsistent with a provision of the articles, bylaws, a resolution of the members or an agreement in effect at the time of the accrual of the alleged cause of action asserted in the proceeding in which the expenses were incurred or other amounts were paid, which prohibits or otherwise limits indemnification; or

(2) That it would be inconsistent with any condition expressly imposed by a court in approving a settlement.

(i) A corporation shall have
 power to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any agent of the corporation against any liability asserted against or incurred by the agent in such capacity or arising out of the agent’s status as such whether or not the corporation would have the power to indemnify the agent against
 that liability under the provisions of this section; provided, however, that a corporation shall have no power to purchase and maintain that insurance to indemnify any agent of the corporation for a violation of Section 5233.

(j) This section does not apply to any proceeding against any trustee, investment manager, or other fiduciary of a pension, deferred compensation, saving, thrift, or other retirement, incentive,
 or benefit plan, trust, or provision for any or all of the corporation’s directors, officers, employees, and persons providing services to the corporation or any of its subsidiary or related or affiliated corporations, in that person’s capacity as such, even though the person may also be an agent as defined in subdivision (a) of the employer corporation. A corporation shall have power to indemnify the
 trustee, investment manager or other fiduciary to the extent permitted by subdivision (f) of Section
 5140.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.   (AB 2668)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5239.

(a) There shall be no personal liability to a third party for monetary damages on the part of a volunteer director or volunteer executive officer of a nonprofit corporation subject to this part, caused by the director’s or officer’s negligent act or omission in the performance of that person’s duties as a director or officer, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The act or omission was within the scope of the director’s or executive officer’s duties.

(2) The act or omission was performed in good faith.

(3) The act or omission was not reckless, wanton, intentional, or grossly negligent.

(4) Damages caused by the act or omission are covered pursuant to a liability insurance policy issued to the corporation, either in the form of a general liability policy or a director’s and officer’s liability policy, or personally to the director or executive officer. In the event that the damages are not covered by a liability insurance policy, the volunteer director or volunteer executive officer shall not be personally liable for the damages if the board of directors of the corporation and the person had made all reasonable efforts in good faith to obtain available liability insurance.

(b) “Volunteer” means the rendering of services without compensation. “Compensation” means remuneration whether by way of salary, fee, or other consideration for services rendered. However, the payment of per diem, mileage, or other reimbursement expenses to a director or executive officer does not affect that person’s status as a volunteer within the meaning of this section.

(c) “Executive officer” means the president, vice president, secretary, or treasurer of a corporation, or such other individual who serves in like capacity, who assists in establishing the policy of the corporation.

(d) Nothing in this section shall limit the liability of the corporation for any damages caused by acts or omissions of the volunteer director or volunteer executive officer.

(e) This section does not eliminate or limit the liability of a director or officer for any of the following:

(1) As provided in Section 5233 or 5237.

(2) In any action or proceeding brought by the Attorney General.

(f) Nothing in this section creates a duty of care or basis of liability for damage or injury caused by the acts or omissions of a director or officer.

(g) This section is only applicable to causes of action based upon acts or omissions occurring on or after January 1, 1988.

(h) As used in this section as applied to nonprofit public benefit corporations which have an annual budget of less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and that are exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, the condition of making “all reasonable efforts in good faith to obtain available liability insurance” shall be satisfied by the corporation if it makes at least one inquiry per year to purchase a general liability insurance policy and that insurance was not available at a cost of less than 5 percent of the previous year’s annual budget of the corporation. If the corporation is in its first year of operation, this subdivision shall apply for as long as the budget of the corporation does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in its first year of operation.

An inquiry pursuant to this subdivision shall obtain premium costs for a general liability policy with an amount of coverage of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Investments [5240. - 5241.]

5240.

(a) This section applies to all assets held by the corporation for investment. Assets which are directly related to the corporation’s public or charitable programs are not subject to this section.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), in investing, reinvesting, purchasing, acquiring, exchanging, selling and managing the corporation’s investments, the board shall do the following:

(1) Avoid speculation, looking instead to the permanent disposition of the funds, considering the probable income, as well as the probable safety of the corporation’s capital.

(2) Comply with additional standards, if any, imposed by the articles, bylaws or express terms of an instrument or agreement pursuant to which the assets were contributed to the corporation.

(c) No investment violates this section where it conforms to provisions authorizing the investment contained in an instrument or agreement pursuant to which the assets were contributed to the corporation. No investment violates this section or Section 5231 where it conforms to provisions requiring the investment contained in an instrument or agreement pursuant to which the assets were contributed to the corporation.

(d) In carrying out duties under this section, each director shall act as required by subdivision (a) of Section 5231, may rely upon others as permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 5231, and shall have the benefit of subdivision (c) of Section 5231, and the board may
 delegate its investment powers as permitted by Section 5210.

(e) Compliance with the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (Part 7 (commencing with Section 18501) of Division 9 of the Probate Code), if that act would be applicable, will be deemed to be compliance with subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (AB 792)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5241.

Nothing in Section 5240 shall abrogate or restrict the power of the appropriate court in proper cases to direct or permit a corporation to deviate from the terms of a trust or agreement regarding the making or retention of investments. Notice of such action or proceeding shall be given to the Attorney General who may intervene.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Examination by Attorney General [5250. - 5250.]

5250.

A corporation is subject at all times to examination by the Attorney General, on behalf of the state, to ascertain the condition of its affairs and to what extent, if at all, it fails to comply with trusts which it has assumed or has departed from the purposes for which it is formed. In case of any such failure or departure the Attorney General may institute, in the name of the state, the proceeding necessary to correct the noncompliance or departure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Compliance With Internal Revenue Code [5260. - 5260.]

5260.

Notwithstanding any other law, every corporation, during any period or periods that corporation is deemed to be a “private foundation” as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, shall distribute its income for each taxable year (and principal, if necessary) at the time and in a manner so as not to subject that corporation to tax under Section 4942 of that code, and the corporation shall not engage in any act of self-dealing as defined in subsection (d) of Section 4941 of that code, retain any excess business holdings as defined in subsection (c) of Section 4943 of that code, make any investments in a manner that subjects the corporation to tax under Section 4944 of that code, or make any taxable expenditure as defined in subsection (d) of Section 4945 of that code.

This section shall apply to any corporation, and any provision contained in its articles of incorporation or other governing instrument inconsistent with, or contrary to, this section shall be without effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   (SB 363)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Members [5310. - 5354.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance of Memberships [5310. - 5313.]

5310.

(a) A corporation may admit persons to membership, as provided in its articles or bylaws, or may provide in its articles or bylaws that it shall have no members. In the absence of any provision in its articles or bylaws providing for members, a corporation shall have no members.

(b) In the case of a corporation which has no members, any action for which there is no specific provision of this part applicable to a corporation which has no members and which would otherwise require approval by a majority of all members (Section 5033) or approval by the members (Section 5034) shall require only approval of the board, any provision of this part or the articles or bylaws to the contrary notwithstanding.

(c) Reference in this part to a corporation which has no members includes a corporation in which the directors are the only members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 812, Sec. 1.7.)
-------------------------------------------

5311.

Subject to the articles or bylaws, memberships may be issued by a corporation for no consideration or for such consideration as is determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5312.

No person may hold more than one membership, and no fractional memberships may be held, provided, however, that:

(a) Two or more persons may have an indivisible interest in a single membership when authorized by, and in such manner or under the circumstances prescribed by, the articles or bylaws subject to Section 5612; and

(b) If the articles or bylaws provide for classes of membership and if the articles or bylaws permit a person to be a member of more than one class, a person may hold a membership in one or more classes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5313.

Except as provided in its articles or bylaws, a corporation may admit any person to membership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transfer of Memberships [5320. - 5320.]

5320.

(a) Subject to Section 5613, and unless otherwise provided in the corporation’s articles or bylaws:

(1) No member may transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom.

(2) All rights of membership cease upon the member’s death or dissolution.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no member may transfer for value a membership or any right arising therefrom.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), this section does not prohibit or restrict the transfer, purchase, or sale of a membership in a limited equity housing cooperative, provided that the transfer, purchase, or sale is consistent with Section 33007.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Types of Memberships [5330. - 5332.]

5330.

A corporation may issue memberships having different rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions, as authorized by its articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5331.

Except as provided in or authorized by the articles or bylaws, all memberships shall have the same rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions and conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5332.

(a) A corporation may refer to persons associated with it as “members” even though such persons are not members within the meaning of Section 5056; but references to members in this part mean members as defined in Section 5056. 

(b) A corporation may benefit, serve, or assist persons who are not members within the meaning of Section 5056 for such consideration, if any, as the board may determine or as is authorized or provided for in the articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Termination of Memberships [5340. - 5342.]

5340.

(a) A member may resign from membership at any time.

(b) This section shall not relieve the resigning member from any obligation for charges incurred, services or benefits actually rendered, dues, assessments or fees, or arising from contract or otherwise, and this section shall not diminish any right of the corporation to enforce any such obligation or obtain damages for its breach.

(c) A membership issued for a period of time shall expire when such period of time has elapsed unless the membership is renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5341.

(a) No member may be expelled or suspended, and no membership or membership rights may be terminated or suspended, except according to procedures satisfying the requirements of this section. An expulsion, termination or suspension not in accord with this section shall be void and without effect.

(b) Any expulsion, suspension or termination must be done in good faith and in a fair and reasonable manner. Any procedure which conforms to the requirements of subdivision (c) is fair and reasonable, but a court may also find other procedures to be fair and reasonable when the full circumstances of the suspension, termination, or expulsion are considered.

(c) A procedure is fair and reasonable when:

(1) The provisions of the procedure have been set forth in the articles or bylaws, or copies of such provisions are sent annually to all the members as required by the articles or bylaws;

(2) It provides the giving of 15 days prior notice of the expulsion, suspension or termination and the reasons therefor; and

(3) It provides an opportunity for the member to be heard, orally or in writing, not less than five days before the effective date of the expulsion, suspension or termination by a person or body authorized to decide that the proposed expulsion, termination or suspension not take place.

(d) Any notice required under this section may be given by any method reasonably calculated to provide actual notice. Any notice given by mail must be given by first-class or registered mail sent to the last address of the member shown on the corporation’s records.

(e) Any action challenging an expulsion, suspension or termination of membership, including any claim alleging defective notice, must be commenced within one year after the date of the expulsion, suspension or termination. In the event such an action is successful the court may order any relief, including reinstatement, it finds equitable under the circumstances, but no vote of the members or of the board may be set aside solely because a person was at the time of the vote wrongfully excluded by virtue of the challenged expulsion, suspension or termination, unless the court finds further that the wrongful expulsion, suspension or termination was in bad faith and for the purpose, and with the effect, of wrongfully excluding the member from the vote or from the meeting at which the vote took place, so as to affect the outcome of the vote.

(f) This section governs only the procedures for expulsion, suspension or termination and not the substantive grounds therefor. An expulsion, suspension or termination based upon substantive grounds which violate contractual or other rights of the member or are otherwise unlawful, is not made valid by compliance with this section.

(g) A member who is expelled or suspended or whose membership is terminated shall be liable for any charges incurred, services or benefits actually rendered, dues, assessments or fees incurred before the expulsion, suspension or termination or arising from contract or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 589, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5342.

(a) An amendment of the articles or bylaws which would terminate all memberships or any class of memberships shall meet the requirements of this part and this section.

(b) Before such an amendment is adopted the corporation shall give written notice to members not less than 45 nor more than 90 days prior to any vote by the members on the amendment. The written notice shall describe the effect of the amendment on the corporation and the members. However, written notice need not be given at least 45 days prior to any vote by the members on the amendment if all members entitled to vote receive a written notice prior to the vote setting forth the information described in the preceding sentence and sign a written waiver of 45 days notice.

(c) Any such amendment shall be approved by the members (Section 5034).

(d) The articles or bylaws may impose additional requirements regarding termination of all memberships or any class of memberships.

(e) Upon request of a member the corporation shall provide at its option the rights set forth in either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6330 as soon as reasonably possible to allow the member to communicate with other members regarding the proposed amendment.

(f) Any such amendment shall terminate the rights members have pursuant to this part as members (Section 5056).

(g) The provisions of Section 5341 shall not apply to termination of all memberships or any class of memberships pursuant to an amendment of the articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 766, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Rights and Obligations of Members and Creditors [5350. - 5354.]

5350.

(a) A member of a corporation is not, as such, personally liable for the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation.

(b) No person is liable for any obligation arising from membership unless the person was admitted to membership upon the person’s application or with the person’s consent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5351.

A corporation may levy dues, assessments or fees upon its members pursuant to its articles or bylaws, but a member upon learning of them may avoid liability for them by promptly resigning from membership, except where the member is, by contract or otherwise, liable for them. Article or bylaw provisions authorizing such dues, assessments or fees do not, of themselves, create such liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5352.

(a) No action shall be brought by or on behalf of any creditor to reach and apply the liability, if any, of a member to the corporation to pay the amount due on such member’s membership or otherwise due to the corporation unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the corporation and execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless such proceedings would be useless.

(b) All creditors of the corporation, with or without reducing their claims to judgment, may intervene in any such creditor’s action to reach and apply unpaid amounts due the corporation and any or all members who owe amounts to the corporation may be joined in such action. Several judgments may be rendered for and against the parties to the action or in favor of a receiver for the benefit of the respective parties thereto.

(c) All amounts paid by any member in any such action shall be credited on the unpaid balance due the corporation by such member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5353.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as in derogation of any rights or remedies which any creditor or member may have against any promoter, member, director, officer or the corporation because of participation in any fraud or illegality practiced upon such creditor or member by any such person or by the corporation in connection with the issue or sale of memberships or securities or in derogation of any rights which the corporation may have by rescission, cancellation or otherwise because of any fraud or illegality practiced on it by any such person in connection with the issue or sale of memberships or securities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5354.

A person holding a membership as executor, administrator, guardian, trustee, receiver or in any representative or fiduciary capacity is not personally liable for any unpaid balance of the purchase price of the membership, or for any amounts owing to the corporation by the member, because the membership is so held; but the estate and funds in the hands of such fiduciary are liable therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Distributions [5410. - 5420.]



  ARTICLE 1. Limitations [5410. - 5410.]

5410.

No corporation shall make any distribution. This section shall not apply to the purchase of a membership in a limited-equity housing cooperative, as defined in Section 33007.5 of the Health and Safety Code, which is organized as a public benefit corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 250, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Liability of Members [5420. - 5420.]

5420.

(a) Any person who receives any distribution is liable to the corporation for the amount so received by such person with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments until paid.

(b) Suit may be brought in the name of a corporation by a creditor, a director, the Attorney General, or, subject to meeting the requirements of Section 5710, a member. In any such action in addition to the remedy provided in subdivision (a), the court may award punitive damages for the benefit of the corporation against any director, officer, member or other person who with intent to defraud the corporation caused, received or aided and abetted in the making of any distribution.

(c) Any person sued under this section may implead all other persons liable under this section and may in the absence of fraud by a moving party compel contribution, either in that action or in an independent action against persons not joined in the action.

(d) This section shall not affect any liability which any person may have under the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3439) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Civil Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 19.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Meetings and Voting [5510. - 5527.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5510. - 5517.]

5510.

(a) Meetings of members may be held at a place within or without this state as may be stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no other place is stated or so fixed, meetings of members shall be held at the principal office of the corporation. Subject to any limitations in the articles or the bylaws of the corporation, if authorized by the board of directors in its sole discretion, and subject to those guidelines and procedures as the board of directors may adopt, members not physically present in person (or, if proxies are allowed, by proxy) at a meeting of members may, by electronic transmission by and to the corporation (Sections 20 and 21), electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, participate in a meeting of members, be deemed present in person (or, if
 proxies are allowed, by proxy), and vote at a meeting of members, subject to subdivision (f).

(b) A regular meeting of members shall be held on a date, time, and with the frequency stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, but in any event in each year in which directors are to be elected at that meeting for the purpose of conducting such election, and to transact any other proper business which may be brought before the meeting.

(c) If a corporation with members is required by subdivision (b) to hold a regular meeting and fails to hold the regular meeting for a period of 60 days after the date designated therefor or, if no date has been designated, for a period of 15 months after the formation of the corporation, or after its last regular meeting, or if the corporation fails to hold a written ballot for a period of 60 days after the date designated therefor, then the
 superior court of the proper county may summarily order the meeting to be held or the ballot to be conducted upon the application of a member or the Attorney General, after notice to the corporation giving it an opportunity to be heard.

(d) The votes represented, either in person (or, if proxies are allowed, by proxy), at a meeting called or by written ballot ordered pursuant to subdivision (c), and entitled to be cast on the business to be transacted shall constitute a quorum, notwithstanding any provision of the articles or bylaws or in this part to the contrary. The court may issue such orders as may be appropriate, including, without limitation, orders designating the time and place of the meeting, the record date for determination of members entitled to vote, and the form of notice of the meeting.

(e) Special meetings of members for any lawful purpose may be called by the
 board, the chairperson of the board, the president, or such other persons, if any, as are specified in the bylaws. In addition, special meetings of members for any lawful purpose may be called by 5 percent or more of the members.

(f) A meeting of the members may be conducted, in whole or in part, by electronic transmission by and to the corporation, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication if the corporation implements reasonable measures: (1) to provide members and proxyholders, if proxies are allowed, a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the members, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting concurrently with those proceedings, (2) if any member or proxyholder, if proxies are allowed, votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of electronic transmission to the corporation, electronic video
 screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, to maintain a record of that vote or action in its books and records, and (3) to verify that each person who has voted remotely is a member or proxyholder, if proxies are allowed. A corporation shall not conduct a meeting of members solely by electronic transmission by and to the corporation, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication unless one or more of the following conditions apply: (A) all of the members consent; (B) the board determines it is necessary or appropriate because of an emergency, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (n) of Section 5140; or (C) notwithstanding the absence of consent from all members pursuant to (A) or subdivision (b) of Section 20, the meeting includes a live audiovisual feed for the duration of the meeting. A corporation holding a meeting pursuant to (C) may offer, in addition to remote audiovisual feed, an audio-only means by
 which a member or proxyholder may participate provided that the choice between participating via audiovisual or via audio-only means is made by the member or proxyholder and the corporation does not impose any barriers to either mode of participation. A de minimis disruption of an audio or audiovisual feed does not require a corporation to end a meeting under, or render the corporation out of compliance with, this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 39.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5511.

(a) Whenever members are required or permitted to take any action at a meeting, a written notice of the meeting shall be given not less than 10 nor more than 90 days before the date of the meeting to each member who, on the record date for notice of the meeting, is entitled to vote thereat; provided, however, that if notice is given by mail, and the notice is not mailed by first-class, registered, or certified mail, that notice shall be given not less than 20 days before the meeting. Subject to subdivision (f), and subdivision (b) of Section 5512, that notice shall state the place, date and time of the meeting, the means of electronic transmission by and to the corporation (Sections 20 and 21), electronic video screen communication, conference
 telephone, or other means of remote communication, if any, by which members may participate in that meeting, and (1) in the case of a special meeting, the general nature of the business to be transacted, and no other business may be transacted, or (2) in the case of the regular meeting, those matters which the board, at the time the notice is given, intends to present for action by the members, but, except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 5512, any proper matter may be presented at the meeting for such action. The notice of any meeting at which directors are to be elected shall include the names of all those who are nominees at the time the notice is given to members.

(b) (1) Notice of a members’ meeting or any report shall be given personally, by electronic transmission by the corporation, or by mail or
 other means of written communication, addressed to the member at the address of such member appearing on the books of the corporation or given by the member to the corporation for purpose of notice, or if no such address appears or is given, at the place where the principal office of the corporation is located or by publication at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office is located. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the notice of a members’ meeting or any report may be sent by electronic communication or other means of remote communication if the board determines it is necessary or appropriate because of an emergency, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (n) of Section 5140. An affidavit of giving of any notice or report as permitted because of an emergency or otherwise in accordance with the provisions of this part, executed by the secretary,
 assistant secretary, or any transfer agent, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of the notice or report.

(2) If any notice or report addressed to a member at the address of such member appearing on the books of the corporation is
 returned to the corporation by the United States Postal Service marked to indicate that the United States Postal Service is unable to deliver the notice or report to the member at such address, all future notices or reports shall be deemed to have been duly given without further mailing if the same shall be available for the member upon written demand of the member at the principal office of the corporation for a period of one year from the date of the giving of the notice or report to all other members.

(3) (A) Notice given by electronic transmission by the corporation under this subdivision shall be valid only if it complies with Section 20. Notwithstanding the foregoing, notice shall not be given by electronic transmission by the corporation under this subdivision after either of the following:

(i) The corporation is unable to deliver two consecutive notices to the member by that means.

(ii) The inability to so deliver the notices to the member becomes known to the secretary, any assistant secretary, the transfer agent, or other person responsible for the giving of the notice.

(B) This paragraph shall not apply if notices are provided by electronic communication or other means of remote communication as permitted because of an emergency.

(c) Upon request in writing to the corporation addressed to the attention of the chairperson of the board, president, vice president, or secretary by any person (other than the board) entitled to call a special
 meeting of members, the officer forthwith shall cause notice to be given to the members entitled to vote that a meeting will be held at a time fixed by the board, not less than 35 nor more than 90 days after the receipt of the request. If the notice is not given within 20 days after receipt of the request, the persons entitled to call the meeting may give the notice or the superior court of the proper county shall summarily order the giving of the notice, after notice to the corporation giving it an opportunity to be heard. The court may issue such orders as may be appropriate, including, without limitation, orders designating the time and place of the meeting, the record date for determination of members entitled to vote, and the form of notice.

(d) When a members’ meeting is adjourned to another time or place, unless the bylaws otherwise
 require and except as provided in this subdivision, notice need not be given of the adjourned meeting if the time and place thereof (or the means of electronic transmission by and to the corporation, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, or electronic video screen communication, if any, by which members may participate) are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken. No meeting may be adjourned for more than 45 days. At the adjourned meeting the corporation may transact any business which might have been transacted at the original meeting. If after the adjournment a new record date is fixed for notice or voting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each member who, on the record date for notice of the meeting, is entitled to vote at the meeting.

(e) The transactions of any meeting
 of members, however called and noticed, and wherever held, are as valid as though had at a meeting duly held after regular call and notice, if a quorum is present either in person or by proxy, and if, either before or after the meeting, each of the persons entitled to vote, not present in person or by proxy, provides a waiver of notice or consent to the holding of the meeting, or an approval of the minutes thereof in writing. All such waivers, consents, and approvals shall be filed with the corporate records or made a part of the minutes of the meeting. Attendance of a person at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of and presence at such meeting, except when the person objects, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened and except that attendance at a meeting is not a waiver of any right to object to the
 consideration of matters required by this part to be included in the notice but not so included, if such objection is expressly made at the meeting. Neither the business to be transacted at nor the purpose of any regular or special meeting of members need be specified in any written waiver of notice, consent to the holding of the meeting, or approval of the minutes thereof, unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, except as provided in subdivision (f).
